Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.150

Consolidation of requirements for categorical grant programs—Use of electronic applications and reporting.

The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with school district personnel, shall consolidate and streamline the planning, application, and reporting requirements for major state and federal categorical and grant programs. The superintendent also shall take actions to increase the use of online electronic applications and reporting.

[ 1999 c 388 s 602.]